Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 3. Child Support
§ 20-2-309.
Contents of orders; change of address or employment; income withholding entered; payment.

All orders shall include the:

Names of the parties;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 121, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 72, § 2.

Right of either party or, when appropriate, the department of family services to petition to enforce an order pursuant to W.S.

20-2-201

through

20-2-204

,

20-2-310

and 20-2-311(d).

All child support orders shall be accompanied by a confidential statement that contains the names, addresses, dates of birth, places of birth and social security numbers of each party and each child to whom the order relates and the names and addresses of each party’s employer. Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the confidential statement may be inspected by:

The parties and their attorneys;

The department of family services to the extent necessary to enforce the Child Support Enforcement Act and the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act; and

Other persons or entities, if permitted by court order.

The court shall order each party to notify the clerk of court in writing within fifteen (15) days of any change in address or employment.

In any subsequent enforcement action brought under this chapter in which the parties were previously ordered to provide the clerk of the court with their current residential, mailing and employer’s address, the court, upon sufficient showing to the satisfaction of the court that a diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of a party, shall deem state due process requirements for notice and service of process to be met upon delivery of written notice to the most recent residential or employer address of that party filed with the clerk of the district court and the state case registry pursuant to the requirements of this section provided:

An affidavit attesting to the diligent effort to locate the party is filed with the court at the time of filing the subsequent enforcement action; and

Delivery of the written notice to the most recent residential or employer address of the party is made by personal service or by certified mail.

Upon entry of any order for the support of a child under this section the court shall also enter an income withholding order as provided by W.S.

20-6-204

.

All child support payments shall be paid to the clerk as defined by W.S. 20-6-102(a)(x).

For purposes of this section, “party” does not include the department of family services.

The confidential statement required pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall not be inspected or further released except as provided in this subsection if the court has issued a confidentiality order pursuant to W.S.

35-21-112

or any other court order allowing a party to maintain confidentiality of addresses, city or state of residence or other information identifying the residence of the victim of domestic abuse. The court may release the confidential statement required under subsection (b) of this section to the department of family services to the extent necessary to enforce the Child Support Enforcement Act and the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, provided:

The department releases information protected by a confidentiality order only to governmental agencies or courts of competent jurisdiction and does not release information protected by the confidentiality order to the opposing party or attorneys representing or employed by the opposing party;

The department shall exclude or redact information protected by a confidentiality order from information provided under this subsection to the greatest extent possible in conformance with the Child Support Enforcement Act and the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act;

The department shall provide written notice to parties receiving information protected by a confidentiality order from the department stating that the information is protected by a confidentiality order and shall only be disseminated by the receiving party to the extent necessary to comply with the Child Support Enforcement Act and the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 72, § 1; 2003, ch. 155, § 1; 2004, ch. 72, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 121, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2004 amendment

rewrote the section, moving provisions from the introductory language in (a) and from repealed (a)(iii) to (a)(i), (a)(iv) and new (b), redesignating subsections because of the addition of (b), and adding (g).

Laws 2004, ch. 72, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(i), deleted “addresses, dates of birth and places of birth” following “Name” and “and all children to whom the order relates” at the end; repealed former (a)(ii), which read: “Names and addresses of each party's employer; and”; and in the introductory language of (b), inserted “names, addresses, dates of birth, places of birth and” and “to whom the order relates and the names and addresses of each party's employer.”

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “as defined by W.S. 20-6-102(a)(x)” for “of the district court” in (f).

The second
2013 amendment, by ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2013, added “Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section” in (b); added (h).

§ 20-2-310.
Enforcement of child support.

In any proceeding to enforce the decree concerning the maintenance of children, any required notice or pleading shall be served as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

A court may, upon appropriate motion, require a parent to appear before the court and show just cause why the parent should not be held in contempt and, upon a showing that the parent has willfully violated a child support order, make such order or orders as the court deems necessary and appropriate.

In any case in which child support has been ordered to be paid to the clerk, any periodic payment or installment under the provisions of an order concerning maintenance is, on the date it is due, a judgment by operation of law.

If an able-bodied obligor is unemployed and otherwise unable to fulfill his court-ordered child support obligation, the court may order the obligor to participate in the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) work program administered by the department of workforce services, excluding the benefit portion of that program, without regard to the program eligibility requirements under title 42 or the department rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

The court in order to enforce and require future compliance with an order, may find that the parent is in contempt of court, award attorney fees, costs and any other relief as the court may deem necessary under the circumstances.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3; 2013 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “of the court” preceding “any periodic payment” in (c).

Not applicable when action not to enforce child support.—

Judgment on arrearages by operation of law.—

Right to counsel in contempt proceeding. —

Not applicable when action not to enforce child support.—

Trial court erred in ordering 10% post-judgment interest under this section, because the judgment was not an order to enforce child support. Lew v. Lew, 2019 WY 99, 449 P.3d 683,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2019).

Judgment on arrearages by operation of law.—

District court erred by failing to recognize that a mother had a judgment against the father on child support arrears on the dates when they were due by operation of law with the full force, effect, and attributes of a judgment of the State of Wyoming, including the ability to be enforced. Furthermore, the district court did not have authority to impede the mother's right to enforce the judgment. Rambo v. Rambo, 2017 WY 32, 391 P.3d 1108,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2017).

Right to counsel in contempt proceeding. —

Fourteenth Amendment's guarantee of due process did not require the State of Wyoming to provide an indigent party with counsel in a civil contempt proceeding for nonpayment of child support, because Wyoming had sufficient substitute procedural safeguards to protect indigent obligors against the possibility of wrongful incarceration. Respondent was informed of the burden on the State to show a failure to pay court ordered child support was willful; all respondents were provided forms upon which they could set forth current income, asset and liability information and were given opportunity to explain any reasons they may have for failure to pay; and the district court was also required make an express finding as to the obligor's ability to pay in order to determine whether the failure was willful or not under this section.
Dep't of Family Servs. v. Currier, 2013 WY 16, 295 P.3d 837,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to credit against child support arrearages for time children spent in custody of noncustodial parent pursuant to visitation or court order, 118 ALR 5th 385.

Right to credit on child-support arrearages for money given directly to child, 119 ALR 5th 445.

Right to credit against child support arrearages for time child lived with noncustodial parent, other than for visitation or by court order, with approval of custodial parent, 120 ALR 5th 229.

Right to credit on child support for contributions to housing costs, utility bills, and other alleged household necessities made for child's benefit while child is not living with obligor parent, 123 ALR 5th 565.

Right to credit on child support arrearages for gifts to child, 124 ALR 5th 441.

§ 20-2-311.
Adjustment of child support orders.

Any party, or the department of family services in the case of child support orders being enforced by the department, may petition for a review and adjustment of any child support order that was entered more than six (6) months prior to the petition or which has not been adjusted within six (6) months from the date of filing of the petition for review and adjustment. The petition shall allege that, in applying the presumptive child support established by this article, the support amount will change by twenty percent (20%) or more per month from the amount of the existing order. The court shall require the parents to complete a verified financial statement on forms approved by the Wyoming supreme court, and shall apply the presumptive child support set out in this article in conducting the review and adjustment. If, upon applying the presumptive child support to the circumstances of the parents or child at the time of the review, the court finds that the support amount would change by twenty percent (20%) or more per month from the amount of the existing order, the court shall consider there to be a change of circumstances sufficient to justify the modification of the support order. The provisions of this section do not preclude a party or assignee from bringing an action for modification of a support order, based upon a substantial change of circumstances, at any time. Every three (3) years, upon the request of either parent or, if there is a current assignment of support rights in effect, upon the request of the department, the court, with respect to a support order being enforced under this article and taking into account the best interests of the child involved, shall review and, if appropriate, adjust the order in accordance with the guidelines established pursuant to this article. Any adjustment under the three (3) year cycle shall be made without a requirement for a showing of a change in circumstances. The commencement of aid under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program, medical benefits under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, supplemental nutrition assistance program and supplemental security income (SSI) shall be considered a substantial change of circumstances requiring modification of child support.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the parties fail to agree that the presumptive child support amount under W.S.

20-2-304

is appropriate, the court may order the party seeking to deviate from the presumptive child support amount to pay a reasonable attorney fee and court costs to the other party unless, after hearing the evidence and considering the factors contained in W.S. 20-2-307(b), the court deviates from the presumptive support amount.

In addition to the petition authorized under subsection (a) of this section, the court on its own motion, or the department without petitioning the court, may increase monthly child support payments to include amounts for arrearages or may decrease the monthly child support payment in cases of emergencies or if the arrearages are paid. Any action by the department to increase monthly child support payments under this subsection shall allow the obligor a reasonable opportunity to contest the action in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and rules and regulations adopted by the department.

An order for child support is not subject to retroactive modification except:

Upon agreement of the parties; or

The order may be modified with respect to any period during which a petition for modification is pending, but only from the date notice of that petition was served upon the obligee as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, if the obligor or the department is the petitioner, or to the obligor, if the obligee or the department is the petitioner.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 60, § 1; Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 3; Laws 1993, ch. 184, § 1; Laws 1997, ch. 193, § 2; ch. 196, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

20-6-306

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance program” for “food stamps” near the end of (a).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this article,” referred to in this section, see § 20-2-303(a)(iv).

Change in circumstances.

—

District court abused its discretion by reopening the stipulated child support order because it did not require the mother to show a change in circumstances regarding child support other than a 20 percent change in the presumptive support amount; because the mother made no request to set aside the parties’ child support stipulation to correct a mistake or for any other reason, no basis existed for the district court to disregard the stipulated amounts. Kimzey v. Kimzey, 2020 WY 52, 461 P.3d 1229,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2020).

Petition requirement. —

The clear language of former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-113(a) instructs that the court may not, of its own initiative, modify its own order with respect to, among other things, a child support obligation absent a proper petition by one of the parents requesting such modification. Erhart v. Evans, 2001 WY 79, 30 P.3d 542,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2001).

Burden of proof. —

Under former Wyo. Stat. Ann. 20-2-113(a), the party who seeks to have a child support order modified has the burden of showing that a substantial or material change in circumstances has occurred since the initial decree was entered. Erhart v. Evans, 2001 WY 79, 30 P.3d 542,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2001).

The party seeking modification of a child support order must establish that there has been a material and substantial change in circumstances subsequent to the decree that outweighs the interests of society in applying the doctrine of res judicata. Goody v. Goody, 939 P.2d 731,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1997).

Remedy for indigent obligors. —

Fourteenth Amendment's guarantee of due process does not require
the State of Wyoming to provide an indigent party with counsel in
a civil contempt proceeding for nonpayment of child support, because
Wyoming has sufficient substitute procedural safeguards to protect
indigent obligors against the possibility of wrongful incarceration.
Specifically, there are procedures available under this section for
parents to obtain modification of their child support obligations
when they are unable to comply.
Dep't of Family Servs. v. Currier, 2013 WY 16, 295 P.3d 837,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2013).

Use of financial affidavits and testimony. —

Where a mother filed a financial affidavit as was contemplated by subsection (a), even though the court ruled that the affidavit was incomplete and, instead of using it, used the father's financial affidavit and the mother's testimony to compute the parties' net income and to determine whether the father's child support obligation should be increased, the court had adequate evidence before it to make its calculations and did not abuse its discretion. Pinther v. Pinther, 888 P.2d 1250,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1995).

Deviation from presumptive amount of support. —

2016 child support order did not deviate from the presumptive amount of support, as the district court did not make any specific findings required for deviation. The heightened requirement for modification of a child support order was, therefore, inapplicable and the mother’s showing of a 20 percent change in support justified the district court’s modification of the father’s child support obligation under this section. Brown v. Brown, 2021 WY 26, 480 P.3d 524,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2021).

Rebuttable presumption that modification is warranted created. —

Rather than requiring courts to modify existing support awards, subsection (a) of this section, in conjunction with former §§ 20-6-304(a) and

20-6-302

(now see

20-2-304

and

20-2-307

), created a rebuttable presumption that modification would be warranted when application of the guidelines would result in a 20% change in the monthly support award; this rebuttable presumption applies not only when child support is initially awarded, but also when a support award is modified. Pauling v. Pauling, 837 P.2d 1073,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1992).

Shared custody arrangements.

It was error, based on a prior visitation schedule, to deny a father's
request to reduce the father's child support obligation by calculating
the obligation pursuant to
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-304(c) because the father showed (1) each party had custody
of the parties' child over 40 percent of a year, (2) the calculation
reduced the father's child support obligation over 20 percent, and
(3) the father contributed substantially to the child's expenses,
but child support was not reduced since the father did not meet the
40 or 20 percent requirements under a new visitation schedule that
was approved.
Jensen v. Milatzo-Jensen, 2013 WY 27, 297 P.3d 768,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2013).

Retroactivity.

Father was not entitled to a retroactive modification of child
support, based on a new visitation schedule approved on appeal, because
(1) the father did not request retroactive modification in the trial
court, and (2) retroactive modification was not available since child
support was not modified.
Jensen v. Milatzo-Jensen, 2013 WY 27, 297 P.3d 768,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2013).

Change from shared to primary custody created rebuttable presumption that modification warranted. —

In a child support action, a district court erred by failing to modify child support in a proceeding commenced after a change from shared custody to primary custody with the mother. Pursuant to the presumptive child support guidelines, the father should have been required to pay 20 percent more than he had been required to pay under the previous order. McCulloh v. Drake, 2005 WY 18, 105 P.3d 1091,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2005).

Existence of child support agreement. —

District court erred in denying adjustment of father's child support obligation on grounds that parties had reached a child support agreement, since agreement specifically invoked statutory child support guidelines. Wright v. Wright, 5 P.3d 61,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2000).

Although the parties stipulated that support would be modified after 48 months when the mother completed a four year degree program, their agreement did not prohibit her from seeking modification in the interim where there was a 20 percent change in the presumptive child support level. Pasenelli v. Pasenelli, 2002 WY 159, 57 P.3d 324,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2002).

Support increased despite desire for new home. —

The court properly found that, under the circumstances, a father's desire to have a new home in which to provide a nicer environment for his children was not a sufficient basis for substantially reducing his child support obligation. In fact, the court properly considered the father's needs, as well as those of the children, in arriving at a modificatory increase. Smith v. Smith, 863 P.2d 624,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1993).

Lack of visitation and negative feelings not to be considered. —

Lack of visitation and negative feelings between a noncustodial parent and child are not proper factors that a court may consider in determining whether to deviate from the presumptive support guidelines; such consideration is, therefore, an abuse of discretion. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Evidence upon which original judgment based not to be reconsidered. —

A father was precluded from arguing in a child support modification proceeding that he was never capable of paying the ordered support amount; any objection on that basis was waived by the father's failure to appeal the original decree. Goody v. Goody, 939 P.2d 731,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1997).

A modification hearing is not a time to reconsider the evidence and premises upon which the original judgment was entered, but only to consider whether there has been such a change of circumstances as to warrant a different decree. Goody v. Goody, 939 P.2d 731,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1997).

Change in circumstances. —

Modification of child support was not justified where the record failed to support the father's contention that the mother's unemployment and the fact that the father paid all the children's medical and recreational expenses represented a change in circumstances that had occurred since the original support decree.
Goody v. Goody, 939 P.2d 731,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1997).

Debts acquired subsequent to a divorce decree do not necessarily constitute a change in circumstances sufficient to alter a support order, especially where the debts are largely a result of voluntary choices. Goody v. Goody, 939 P.2d 731,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1997).

Father’s child support obligation was properly modified because, (1) while the mother alleged no material change in circumstances and the trial court did not so find, a material change occurred, as a custody change the mother alleged was more than enough to establish a change in circumstances, and (2) the court found a 20% increase in the presumptive support amount.
Zupan v. Zupan, 2016 WY 78, 377 P.3d 770,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2016).

Calculation of a father’s child support obligation under this section was clearly incorrect as the net income figures specified represented a substantial decrease in the father’s income and a substantial increase in the mother’s income, yet the trial court increased the father’s child support obligation; the trial court was ordered to arrive at a support calculation that complied with the statutory tables.
Walker v. Walker, 2013 WY 132, 311 P.3d 170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2013).

Modification of support in some areas not supported by evidence.—

District court properly reopened the child support provision and ordered the father to pay the presumptive child support amount, only because the mother consented to that specific action, but the evidence did not establish any independent basis for the district court to modify child support or medical payments. Meehan-Greer v. Greer, 2018 WY 39, 415 P.3d 274,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2018).

Later born children.—

District court
properly modified child support because it did not abuse its discretion
in deviating from the presumptive child support amount; once the
district
determined that deviation was appropriate based on the
father’s
obligation to a later-born child from his subsequent
marriage, nothing
prevented it from calculating the appropriate
support obligation
by
considering the presumptive amount for all
of the father’s
children.
TSR v. State ex rel. Dep't of Family Servs., 2017 WY 144, 406 P.3d 729,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2017).

Denial of visitation rights not change in circumstances. —

The denial of visitation rights by either the custodial parent or the child does not constitute a change in circumstances justifying the reduction or termination of the noncustodial parent's support obligation. A child's need for support and a parent's ability to pay are not related to questions concerning visitation. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Change in custody. —

In child custody modification action where child had been taken from mother's custody because of abuse and placed with father, the father did not owe retroactive child support for the time period during which the mother did not have custody. GGV v. JLR, 2002 WY 19, 39 P.3d 1066,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2002).

Public assistance recipients. —

Section 20-6-106(m)(i) (paragraph repealed) authorized the Department of Family Services to bring an action to enforce a child support order pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, without regard to the obligee's status as a recipient or nonrecipient of public assistance. Department of Family Servs. v. Peterson, 960 P.2d 1022,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1998).

No change in circumstances found. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in finding no material change of circumstances justifying modification of child support where parent refused to pay support from severance pay or assets after termination of employment and had not attempted to find a job conforming to her physical restrictions, and the medical condition that she claimed was a change in circumstances existed at the time of the divorce. Murphy v. Holman, 945 P.2d 1193,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1997).

Credit for overpayment of child support obligation. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in refusing to give a father credit for an overpayment of his child support obligation, since
statutes and case law indicated a clear aversion to the unilateral modification of child support orders, and the circumstances did not warrant application of the exception to the general rule because (1) the father overpaid the obligation intentionally and voluntarily, (2) the mother never asked the father for the extra payments, nor did his daughter, (3) the father unilaterally modified that obligation without court approval, and (4) it was the father's obligation to pay the specified amounts according to the decree, and orders modifying it thereafter.
Starkey v. Starkey, 2007 WY 106, 161 P.3d 515,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2007).

Allocation of dependent tax credit. —

Determinations concerning the allocation of the dependent tax credit of I.R.C. § 152(e) are subject to modification under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-311(a). Leseberg v. Taylor, 2003 WY 131, 78 P.3d 201,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2003).

Wyoming courts do not steadfastly apply in all modification proceedings under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-311(a) the Utah standard, requiring the noncustodial parent to demonstrate he or she has a higher income and provides the majority of support for the child and a finding by the district court that allocating the dependent tax credit of I.R.C. § 152 to the noncustodial parent is in the child's best interest; however, Wyoming's trial courts can and do consider both the child's best interest and the parties' relative financial positions when determining the respective support obligations under Wyoming's statutory scheme. Leseberg v. Taylor, 2003 WY 131, 78 P.3d 201,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2003).

District court did not abuse its discretion in finding that no substantial change of circumstances occurred justifying reallocation of the dependent tax credit portion of the parties' divorce decree; even if the mother properly computed the amount of support she provided for the child, the income of the father, the noncustodial parent, remained higher than the mother's. Leseberg v. Taylor, 2003 WY 131, 78 P.3d 201,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2003).

Standard of review. —

A trial court's decision to modify a divorce decree is reviewed for abuse of discretion; an abuse of discretion occurs when a court's decision exceeds the bounds of reason or constitutes an error of law. Goody v. Goody, 939 P.2d 731,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1997).

Retroactivity. —

There was no abuse of discretion in denying retroactive effect to a child support modification where the trial court's decision coincided with the oldest child's 18th birthday, when defendant father was no longer obligated to pay support for that son. Ready v. Ready, 2003 WY 121, 76 P.3d 836,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2003).

Given the parties were sharing custody of the children, the father had been providing insurance for the children and paying half of their uncovered medical expenses and some of the mother’s expenses, and the court did not have sufficient financial information from the parties for the period of retroactivity, the district court’s decision not to award the mother retroactive child support was reasonable. Sears v. Sears, 2021 WY 20, 479 P.3d 767,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2021).

Applied

in

Fleenor v. Fleenor, 992 P.2d 1065,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1999).

Quoted

in

Hasty v. Hasty, 828 P.2d 94,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1992);Smith v. Smith, 2003 WY 87, 72 P.3d 1158,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2003).

Stated

in

Cranston v. Cranston, 879 P.2d 345,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1994); Ahearn v. Ahearn, 993 P.2d 942,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1999).

Cited

in

Kidd v. Kidd, 832 P.2d 566,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Consideration of obligor's personal injury recovery or settlement in fixing alimony or child support, 59 ALR5th 489.

Right to credit against child support arrearages for time child lived in custody of noncustodial parent, other than for visitation, where custodial parent's approval was not in issue or was disputed by parties, 112 ALR5th 185.

Right to credit on child support for health insurance, medical, dental, and orthodontic expenses paid for child's benefit while child is not living with obligor parent, 1 A.L.R.6th 493.

Right to credit on child support for contributions to educational expenses of child while child is not living with obligor parent, 2 A.L.R.6th 439.

Right to credit on child support for contributions to travel expenses of child while child is not living with obligor parent, 3 A.L.R.6th 641.

Right to credit on child support for continued payments to custodial parent for child who has reached majority or otherwise become emancipated, 4 A.L.R.6th 531.

§ 20-2-312.
Redirection of child support.

Upon affidavit by the current custodian or the department filed with the clerk of the district court, or by operation of law when public funds have been expended on behalf of a minor child, that the care and control of the child resides in a party other than the obligee under a child support order, the child support shall, by operation of law, be redirected to the person or agency who has the care and control of the child and shall be subject to assignment by the person having the care and control of the child pursuant to W.S.

20-6-106

. The department, upon proof by affidavit filed with the clerk of district court or upon verified information it has received pursuant to W.S.

20-6-106

that the child support is subject to an assignment, may redirect the child support to the person or agency in whose favor the assignment is made.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1.

§ 20-2-313.
Cessation of child support.

An on-going child support obligation terminates when the:

Parents marry or remarry each other;

Child dies;

Child is legally emancipated; or

Child attains the age of majority.

After the remarriage of the parents to each other, the court may eliminate all child support arrearage existing between the parents except those assigned to the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1.

Age of majority. —

Trial court properly granted a father's request to reduce his child support obligation when his eldest son turned 18-years-old and properly denied the mother's request to apply Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-1-101

as it existed when the parties were divorced in 1992, under which the age of majority was 19, and to extend the father's obligation until the children were 19-years-old where the original divorce decree and settlement agreement did not specify a child support obligation for either parent. Jordan v. Brackin, 2003 WY 151, 79 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2003).

Trial court did not err in ordering child support to end when the child became 18 and in having deviated from the presumptive support level; although the parties were not aware of their son's learning disability at the time that the divorce decree, that decree stated support would end once each child reached the age of 18, and the mother had forgiven the child support arrearages owed to her by the father.
Shelhamer v. Shelhamer, 2006 WY 83, 138 P.3d 665,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2006).

§ 20-2-314.
Court may appoint trustees to manage amount set aside for children.

Upon application by any party, the court may order any amount set apart for the children to be paid to a trustee or trustees appointed by the court, upon trust to invest the same and to apply the income thereof to the support of the children in such manner as the court directs. This section does not apply to periodic payments designated as child support by a court order.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 20; R.S. 1887, § 1586; R.S. 1899, § 3003; C.S. 1910, § 3939; C.S. 1920, § 5005; R.S. 1931, § 35-123; C.S. 1945, § 3-5921; W.S. 1957, § 20-65; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-115

; W.S. 1977, §

20-2-115

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Court's establishment of trust to secure alimony or child support in divorce proceedings, 3 ALR3d 1170.

§ 20-2-315.
Court may require security for child support payments.

Upon the issuance of any order or entering of a decree under this chapter which provides for child support payments, or any time thereafter following notice and opportunity for hearing, the court may, for good cause shown, require the obligor to provide security of nonexempt property that the court deems satisfactory to secure payment of child support.

The court, upon petition and following notice and hearing, shall no longer require the order for security if the court determines:

Good cause no longer exists to require security to assure payment upon the obligation to pay child support; and

There is no overdue support outstanding.

Once the child support obligation has terminated and arrearages satisfied, the security shall be released.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 77, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

20-2-118

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Alimony or child-support awards as subject to attorneys' liens, 49 ALR5th 595.

§ 20-2-316.
Adjustment of child support for a disabled adult child.

A noncustodial parent may petition for an adjustment of child support for a child who has reached the age of majority but qualifies under W.S. 14-2-204(a)(i) to continue to receive support from the noncustodial parent. The court shall allow the adjustment in cases where the noncustodial parent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that an adjustment of the child support order is in the best interest of the child who has reached the age of majority.

A noncustodial parent petitioning the court for an adjustment under this section shall adhere to the requirements of W.S.

20-2-311

.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 24, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 24, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.